North Dakota, session 69, HB1403.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 1-03 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Prisoner of War and Missing in Action Day.
The third Friday in September of each year is Prisoner of War and Missing in Action Day. To
remember and honor the sacrifices of those who were held captive and returned, as well as those who
remain missing, the governor shall issue a proclamation each year designating the third Friday in
September as Prisoner of War and Missing in Action Day, a state holiday. This section may not be
interpreted to make Prisoner of War and Missing in Action Day a day on which schools and other
entities are required to close.

H. B. NO. 1403 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1403.
House Vote: Yeas 93 Nays 0 Absent 1
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State